District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.49

Council record reproduction fees authorized.

Pursuant to § 1-207.42, the Secretary to the Council of the District of Columbia may establish and collect reasonable fees for the reproduction of transcripts or transcriptions of legislative meetings, committee meetings, legislative hearings, investigative hearings, and any other records that are part of the Council of the District of Columbia’s official legislative files.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-6, § 2, 32 DCR 2954
1981 Ed., § 1-236.
For temporary (90 day) disclosure of District of Columbia government documents to the Council, see § 2 of Disclosure of Information to the Council Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-354, February 18, 2004, 51 DCR 2319).